Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201472-272
Production of wind energy or solar energy; agreements; board;
powers.

The board may authorize agreements
for the use of any school or public lands belonging to the state
and under its control for exploration and development of wind energy or solar energy for such durations and
under such terms and conditions as the board shall deem appropriate, except
that such agreements shall comply with sections
66-901 to 66-914. In making such determinations, the board shall
consider comparable arrangements involving other lands similarly situated
and any other relevant factors bearing upon such agreements.

Laws 2010, LB235, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB828, § 13.